Missouri, session 2026, HB2576.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 9.289 as enacted by house bill no. 1738, one hundred first general
assembly, second regular session, and section 9.289 as enacted by house bill no. 2627, one
hundred first general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and fifty new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 9.021, 9.025, 9.238, 9.289, 9.358, 9.392,
9.405, 9.412, 9.413, 9.418, 9.501, 9.502, 9.504, 9.509, 9.510, 9.513, 9.514, 9.516, 10.265,
10.281, 10.282, 10.283, 10.284, 10.287, 10.288, 10.289, 10.292, 227.895, 227.898, 227.900,
227.901, 227.902, 227.903, 227.904, 227.905, 227.906, 227.907, 227.908, 227.909, 227.910,
227.911, 227.912, 227.913, 227.915, 227.917, 227.918, 620.430, 1, 2, and 3, to read as
follows:
9.021. The week beginning the last Monday of September each year shall be
known as "Frontotemporal Degeneration (FTD) Awareness Week" in Missouri.
Frontotemporal degeneration, also frequently referred to as frontotemporal dementia,
represents a group of brain disorders caused by degeneration of the frontal or temporal
lobes of the brain, representing the most common form of dementia for people under the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS #2 SCS HS HB 2576 2
age of sixty. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities that will increase awareness of frontotemporal degeneration, to
support programs of research and education surrounding frontotemporal degeneration,
and to support individuals and families impacted by frontotemporal degeneration.
9.025. The month of January is hereby designated as "Blood Donor Awareness
Month". It is recommended to the people of this state that the month be appropriately
observed through activities that increase awareness of the importance of blood
donation. The state deems blood and blood products to be a critical resource and a vital
public health asset that must be readily available at all times.
9.238. The month of September is hereby designated as "Pediatric Cancer
Awareness Month" in Missouri. Pediatric cancers are the leading cause of death from
disease among children in the United States. The citizens of the state of Missouri are
encouraged to participate in events that honor and support families who have been
impacted by pediatric cancer, raise awareness, and fund research into pediatric cancer
prevention, diagnosis, and treatment.
[9.289. 1. The first full week in May each year shall be known and
designated as "Tardive Dyskinesia Awareness Week". Tardive dyskinesia is a
movement disorder that is characterized by random, involuntary, and
uncontrolled movements of different muscles in the face, trunk, and
extremities. The citizens of this state are encouraged to observe the week
with appropriate events and activities to raise awareness of tardive dyskinesia.
2. The provisions of this section shall expire on August 28, 2026.]
9.289. [1.] The first full week of May each year shall be known and designated as
"Tardive Dyskinesia Awareness Week". Tardive dyskinesia is a movement disorder that is
characterized by random, involuntary, and uncontrolled movements of different muscles in
the face, trunk, and extremities. The citizens of this state are encouraged to observe the week
with appropriate events and activities to raise awareness of tardive dyskinesia.
[2. The provisions of this section shall expire on August 28, 2027.]
9.358. April twenty-second each year is hereby designated as "Missouri Black
Bear Awareness Day". Citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to provide education about efforts to conserve
Missouri's black bear population.
9.392. December first each year is hereby designated as "Freeman Bosley, Sr.
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to celebrate the legendary St. Louis City politician who retired in
2017 after thirty years of service to the city and was an advocate for young people
participating in government and engaging in public service.

SS #2 SCS HS HB 2576 3
9.405. April twenty-seventh each year is hereby designated as "Ulysses S. Grant
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to celebrate the life of the Civil War general and eighteenth
president of the United States, who made his home in St. Louis, Missouri, in the years
following his graduation from West Point and before the Civil War.
9.412. The month of September each year is hereby designated as "Brain
Aneurysm Awareness Month" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
participate in appropriate events and activities to raise awareness about the causes of
and treatments for brain aneurysms, which affect nearly two hundred thousand people
each year.
9.413. November twenty-fourth each year is hereby designated as "Frankie
Muse Freeman Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
participate in appropriate events and activities to celebrate Frankie Muse Freeman, a
St. Louis attorney who was a champion for civil rights, won a landmark case that ended
legal racial discrimination in St. Louis public housing, and was the first black woman
appointed to the United States Commission on Civil Rights by president Lyndon B.
Johnson.
9.418. The last full week of April each year shall be known as "Infertility
Awareness Week" in Missouri. It is estimated that approximately one in eight couples in
the United States experience infertility, impacting people across all racial, ethnic,
socioeconomic, and cultural backgrounds. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
participate in appropriate events and activities to raise awareness about infertility.
9.501. The first full week in September each year is hereby designated as "June's
Week" and "Rare Pediatric Disease Week" in Missouri in honor of June, a young
Missourian undergoing treatment for an atypical teratoid rhabdoid tumor, subtype B
(ATRT-B). The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
and activities to raise public awareness of rare pediatric diseases, encourage early
recognition of symptoms, and honor Missouri children and families affected by rare
pediatric diseases.
9.502. March twenty-sixth of each year is hereby designated as "Pediatric Acute-
Onset Neuropsychiatric Syndrome (PANS)/Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric
Disorder Associated with Streptococcus (PANDAS) Awareness Day". The citizens of
this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events and activities to raise
PANS/PANDAS awareness.
9.504. April fifth each year is hereby designated as "Racquetball Day" in
Missouri, in honor of Kirkwood Racquetball, USA Racquetball's five-time consecutive
high school national champions. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate

SS #2 SCS HS HB 2576 4
in appropriate events and activities to learn more about the sport of racquetball and
celebrate Missouri's racquetball accomplishments.
9.509. April thirtieth each year is hereby designated as "William Lacy Clay Sr.
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to celebrate the life and legacy of William Lacy Clay Sr., who
represented Missouri's first district in Congress from 1969 to 2001 and was one of the
founding members of the Congressional Black Caucus.
9.510. May tenth each year is hereby designated as "Missouri River Runner
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to recognize the role of passenger rail in connecting Missouri
communities, supporting economic development, and promoting safe and reliable
transportation across the state.
9.513. March twelfth each year is hereby designated as "Charlie Parker Day" in
Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
and activities to celebrate the life and contributions of Charlie Parker, an influential
saxophonist, band leader, and composer who was also a leading figure in the
development of bebop.
9.514. July fifteenth each year is hereby designated as "Leon Jordan Day" in
Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
and activities to celebrate the life and legacy of Leon Jordan, an influential African-
American politician and civil rights leader who was assassinated on July 15, 1970, while
serving as a member of the Missouri house of representatives.
9.516. June twenty-eighth each year is hereby designated as "Eliot and Muriel
Battle Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to celebrate the lives of Eliot Battle, the first Black
faculty member at Hickman High School in Columbia, and Muriel Battle, the first Black
principal in the Columbia Public School District. The couple worked as a team to ease
racial tensions during the 1960s and have been recognized with schools in Columbia
named in their honor: Eliot Battle Elementary School and Muriel Williams Battle High
School.
10.265. The song "Missouri", written by Musician 1st Class Kenny Ray Horton,
is selected for, and shall be known as, the official state promotional song for the state of
Missouri.
10.281. The smooth chanterelle, scientifically known as Cantharellus lateritius, is
selected for and shall be known as the official mushroom for the state of Missouri.
10.282. The city of Dexter is selected for and shall be known as the official "Rib
City" for the state of Missouri.

SS #2 SCS HS HB 2576 5
10.283. Missouri Military Academy in the city of Mexico is selected for and shall
be known as the official military academy of the state of Missouri.
10.284. The Missouri Cherry Blossom Festival in the city of Marshfield is
selected for and shall be known as the official state cherry blossom festival for the state
of Missouri.
10.287. The city of Kansas City is selected for and shall be known as the official
"Barbecue Capital" of the state of Missouri.
10.288. The city of Belle is selected for and shall be known as the official
"Cowbell Capital" of the state of Missouri.
10.289. The city of Bland is selected for and shall be officially known as "The
Silver City of the Rock Island Trail" for the state of Missouri.
10.292. If the Kansas City Chiefs relocate outside of this state, the St. Louis
Battlehawks shall be the official professional football team of the state of Missouri.
227.895. The portion of State Highway D from State Highway C continuing
north to State Highway Y in St. Francois County shall be designated as the "Carl G
Koester Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and
maintain signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private donations.
227.898. The portion of State Highway WW from State Highway 13 continuing
to State Highway H in Greene County shall be designated the "Gary D McCormack
Nemo Macto Unus Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect
and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by
the department of transportation.
227.900. The bridge on CST Dougherty Ferry Road crossing over Interstate 270
in St. Louis County shall be designated the "Army SSG Salvatore Palazzolo Memorial
Bridge". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.901. The portion of U.S. Highway 24 from Davis Road continuing east to
Ferguson Spring Road in Jackson County shall be designated the "WWII Robert Earl
Sauls Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private
donations.
227.902. The portion of State Highway E from CRD 101 continuing east to CRD
361 in Johnson County shall be designated the "Captain Vernon Collett Memorial
Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate
signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the department of
transportation.

SS #2 SCS HS HB 2576 6
227.903. The bridge on State Highway CC crossing over Interstate 44 in Webster
County shall be designated the "Dr Tommy Macdonnell Memorial Bridge". The
department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating
such bridge. Notwithstanding provisions of section 227.296, the costs shall be paid by
the department of transportation in recognition of the honoree's Silver Star Award.
227.904. The portion of State Highway 13 from Interstate 35 continuing north to
U.S. Highway 136/69 in Harrison County shall be designated the "Dr Scott Hall
Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private
donations.
227.905. The bridge on Business 63 crossing over U.S. Highway 60 in Howell
County shall be designated the "Jerrad Bennett Memorial Bridge". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such bridge, with
the costs to be paid by private donations.
227.906. The portion of State Highway 9 from Horizons Parkway continuing
north to Park College Entrance Drive in Platte County shall be designated as the
"Firefighter Paramedic Graham J Hoffman Memorial Highway". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway,
with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.907. The bridge on State Highway 139 crossing over Barber Creek in
Putnam County shall be designated the "PVT William W Smith Memorial Bridge".
The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.908. The bridge on State Highway 139 crossing over Hooton/Newtown Creek
in Sullivan County shall be designated the "CPL Vernon D Jobe Memorial Bridge".
The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.909. The bridge on State Highway EE crossing over Medicine Creek in
Sullivan County shall be designated the "PVT Charles A Paxton Memorial Bridge".
The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.910. The portion of State Highway D from CST Quendo Avenue continuing
east to CST Sutter Avenue in St. Louis County shall be designated the "Mayor Mary
Louise Carter Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private
donations.

SS #2 SCS HS HB 2576 7
227.911. The portion of U.S. Highway 61 from CRD R7 School Road continuing
north to CRD Plattin Road in Jefferson County shall be designated the "Army PFC
Gary Prather Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and
maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the
department of transportation.
227.912. The portion of U.S. Highway 63 from the southern access at CST East
Street/State Highway 17 continuing north to CST Main Street in Texas County shall be
designated the "Emmett Kelly Sr Memorial Highway". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway,
with the costs to be paid by private donations.
227.913. The portion of State Highway 79 from State Highway D continuing
north to CRD 118 in Pike County shall be designated as the "Police Chief Richard A
Hughes Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and
maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the
department of transportation.
227.915. The bridge on Interstate 70 crossing over CST Grand Blvd in St. Louis
city shall be designated as the "Freeman Bosley Sr Memorial Bridge". The department
of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such bridge,
with the costs to be paid by private donations.
227.917. The portion of State Route PP from Tanzanite Drive to the eastern fork
in State Route PP in Boone County shall be designated as the "Officer Evan Alexander
Dunn Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the department of
transportation.
227.918. The portion of State Highway AC from Providence Road to Lemone
Industrial Boulevard in Boone County shall be designated as the "Betty Ann McCaskill
Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain signs
designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private donations.
620.430. 1. There is hereby established the designation of "Missouri Rock Island
Trail Community" for municipalities located along the Rock Island Trail corridor that
promote outdoor recreation, heritage tourism, and economic development within this
state.
2. The following municipalities are hereby designated as Missouri Rock Island
Trail communities:
(1) The City of Bland; and
(2) The City of Belle.

SS #2 SCS HS HB 2576 8
3. Additional municipalities located along the Rock Island Trail corridor may be
designated as Missouri Rock Island Trail Communities by act of the general assembly.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the expenditure of state
funds.
Section 1. The portion of Interstate 70 from State Highway 13 continuing east to
State Highway T in Lafayette County shall be designated as "George Seals Memorial
Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private donations.
Section 2. The portion of State Highway 86 from 50th Street continuing south to
Redding Mill Bridge in Newton County shall be designated as the "Constable John
Wesley Harryman Sr Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall
erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid
by private donations.
Section 3. September twelfth of each year is hereby designated as "George Jones
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to recognize the musical accomplishments of George Jones.
✔